Maryland, session 2026, SB0211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 2–801 and 2–802 and the subtitle “Subtitle 8. Maryland Estate Tax
Revenue Distribution”; and 7–301 through 7–305, 7–305.1, and 7–306 through 7–309 and
the subtitle “Subtitle 3. Maryland Estate Tax” of Article – Tax – General of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to decedents dying after June 30, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0211*